Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.907

Hazing—Prevention education—Incident reporting.

(1) Beginning in the 2022 fall academic term, each public and private institution of higher education shall provide hazing prevention education on the signs and dangers of hazing as well as the institution's prohibition on hazing to employees, including student employees, either in person or electronically. The prevention education shall be provided to employees at the beginning of each academic year and for new employees at the beginning of each academic term.

(2) If, as a result of observations or information received in the course of employment or volunteer service, any employee, including a student employee, or volunteer at a public or private institution of higher education has reasonable cause to believe that hazing has occurred, the employee or volunteer shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to a designated authority at the institution. The employee or volunteer shall make the report at the first opportunity to do so.

(3) "Reasonable cause" means a person who witnesses hazing or receives a credible written or oral report alleging hazing or potential or planned hazing activity.

(4) A person who witnesses hazing or has reasonable cause to believe hazing has occurred or will occur and makes a report in good faith may not be sanctioned or punished for the violation of hazing unless the person is directly engaged in the planning, directing, or act of hazing reported.

(5) Nothing in this section shall preclude a person from independently reporting hazing or suspected hazing activity to law enforcement.

(6) As used in this section, "employee" means a person who is receiving wages from the institution of higher education and is in a position with direct ongoing contact with students in a supervisory role or position of authority. "Employee" does not include a person employed as medical staff or with an affiliated organization, entity, or extension of a postsecondary educational institution, unless the employee has a supervisory role or position of authority over students. "Employee" does not include confidential employees.

[ 2022 c 209 s 5.]

NOTES:

Short title—2022 c 209: See note following RCW 28B.10.900.